District of Columbia statutes.
16-4014

Appropriateness of collaborative law process.

Before a prospective party signs a collaborative law participation agreement, a prospective collaborative lawyer shall:

(1)

Assess with the prospective party factors the lawyer reasonably believes relate to whether a collaborative law process is appropriate for the prospective party’s matter;

(2)

Provide the prospective party with information that the lawyer reasonably believes is sufficient for the party to make an informed decision about the material benefits and risks of a collaborative law process as compared to the material benefits and risks of other reasonably available alternatives for resolving the proposed collaborative matter, such as litigation, mediation, arbitration, or expert evaluation; and

(3)

Advise the prospective party that:

(A)

If, after signing an agreement, a party initiates a proceeding or seeks intervention by the tribunal in a pending proceeding related to the collaborative matter, the collaborative law process terminates;

(B)

Participation in a collaborative law process is voluntary and any party has the right to terminate unilaterally a collaborative law process with or without cause; and

(C)

The collaborative lawyer and any lawyer in a law firm with which the collaborative lawyer is associated may not appear before the tribunal to represent a party in a proceeding related to the collaborative matter, except as authorized by § 16-4009(c), § 16-4010(b), or § 16-4011(b).

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928
This section is referenced in § 16-4020.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 14 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.